Washington statutes.
RCW 43.392.020

Target established—Scoping plan.

(1) A target is established for the state that all publicly owned and privately owned passenger and light duty vehicles of model year 2030 or later that are sold, purchased, or registered in Washington state be electric vehicles.

(2) On or before December 31, 2023, the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council created in RCW 43.392.030 shall complete a scoping plan for achieving the 2030 target.

[ 2022 c 182 s 415.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2022 c 182: See notes following RCW 70A.65.240.